Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
657

LIMITATION
OF ACTIONS

Part I. Personal Actions

Section

657-1 Six years

657-1.8 Civil action arising from sexual offenses;

application; certificate of merit

657-2 Mutual current account

657-3 Counterclaim

657-3.5 Relation back of amendments

657-4 Two years; libel and slander

657-5 Domestic judgments and decrees

657-5.5 Judgments for support

657-6 Four years; causes arising in foreign
jurisdiction,

etc.

657-7 Damage to persons or property

657-7.3 Medical torts; limitation of actions; time

657-7.5 Third-party defendants, time in which
plaintiff may

amend

657-8 Limitation of action for damages based on
construction

to improve real property

657-9 Action barred in foreign jurisdiction

657-10 Special limitations

657-11 Recoveries authorized by federal statute

657-12 Repealed

657-13 Infancy, Insanity, imprisonment

657-14 Disability to exist at accrual of action

657-15 Two or more disabilities

657-16, 17 Repealed

657-18 Extension by absence from State

657-19 Extension by injunction

657-20 Extension by fraudulent concealment

657-21 Extension by keeping defendant in ignorance

657-21.5 Extension by sentencing of criminal
defendant

657-22 When process not commencement

657-23 Extension while criminal case is pending

657-24 Periodic payments of damages

Part II. Real Actions

657-31 Twenty years

657-31.5 Adverse possession

657-32 How computed

657-33 Action accrues when

657-33.5 Deregistered land

657-34 Disabilities

657-35 Extension of time by death

657-36 Same

657-37 Repealed

657-38 Possession, interrupting statute

Case Notes

The statutory scheme and legislative history of §386-8
indicated that the phrase "except as limited by [this] chapter" was
not intended to restrict an employee's right to intervene in a lawsuit that was
timely filed by his or her employer; thus, employee was not barred by the
statute of limitations under §657-7 to intervene in plaintiff insurer's timely
filed suit, and the circuit court erred in granting defendant's motion for
summary judgment. 126 H. 406, 271 P.3d 1165 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next